Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1087.
do enact as follows:AB1087,11Section 1. 40.51 (8) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1087,2,6240.51 (8) Every health care coverage plan offered by the state under sub. (6) 3shall comply with ss. 631.89, 631.90, 631.93 (2), 631.95, 632.72 (2), 632.722, 4632.729, 632.746 (1) to (8) and (10), 632.747, 632.748, 632.7498, 632.798, 632.83, 5632.835, 632.85, 632.853, 632.855, 632.861, 632.867, 632.87 (3) to (6), 632.885, 6632.89, 632.895 (5m) and (8) to (17), and 632.896.AB1087,27Section 2. 40.51 (8m) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1087,2,11840.51 (8m) Every health care coverage plan offered by the group insurance 9board under sub. (7) shall comply with ss. 631.95, 632.722, 632.729, 632.746 (1) to 10(8) and (10), 632.747, 632.748, 632.7498, 632.798, 632.83, 632.835, 632.85, 632.853, 11632.855, 632.861, 632.867, 632.885, 632.89, and 632.895 (11) to (17).AB1087,312Section 3. 66.0137 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1087,2,191366.0137 (4) Self-insured health plans. If a city, including a 1st class city, 14or a village provides health care benefits under its home rule power, or if a town 15provides health care benefits, to its officers and employees on a self-insured basis, 16the self-insured plan shall comply with ss. 49.493 (3) (d), 631.89, 631.90, 631.93 (2), 17632.722, 632.729, 632.746 (10) (a) 2. and (b) 2., 632.747 (3), 632.7498, 632.798, 18632.85, 632.853, 632.855, 632.861, 632.867, 632.87 (4) to (6), 632.885, 632.89, 19632.895 (9) to (17), 632.896, and 767.513 (4).AB1087,420Section 4. 120.13 (2) (g) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1087,2,2421120.13 (2) (g) Every self-insured plan under par. (b) shall comply with ss. 2249.493 (3) (d), 631.89, 631.90, 631.93 (2), 632.722, 632.729, 632.746 (10) (a) 2. and 23(b) 2., 632.747 (3), 632.7498, 632.798, 632.85, 632.853, 632.855, 632.861, 632.867, 24632.87 (4) to (6), 632.885, 632.89, 632.895 (9) to (17), 632.896, and 767.513 (4).AB1087,51Section 5. 185.983 (1) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1087,3,92185.983 (1) (intro.) Every voluntary nonprofit health care plan operated by a 3cooperative association organized under s. 185.981 shall be exempt from chs. 600 to 4646, with the exception of ss. 601.04, 601.13, 601.31, 601.41, 601.42, 601.43, 601.44, 5601.45, 611.26, 611.67, 619.04, 623.11, 623.12, 628.34 (10), 631.17, 631.89, 631.93, 6631.95, 632.72 (2), 632.722, 632.729, 632.745 to 632.749, 632.7498, 632.775, 632.79, 7632.795, 632.798, 632.85, 632.853, 632.855, 632.861, 632.867, 632.87 (2) to (6), 8632.885, 632.89, 632.895 (5) and (8) to (17), 632.896, and 632.897 (10) and chs. 609, 9620, 630, 635, 645, and 646, but the sponsoring association shall:AB1087,610Section 6. 609.40 of the statutes is created to read:AB1087,3,1211609.40 Special enrollment period for pregnancy. Preferred provider 12plans and defined network plans are subject to s. 632.7498.AB1087,713Section 7. 632.7498 of the statutes is created to read:AB1087,3,1514632.7498 Special enrollment period for pregnancy. (1) Definitions. In 15this section:AB1087,3,1616(a) “Health benefit plan” has the meaning given in s. 632.745 (11).AB1087,3,1717(b) “Self-insured health plan” has the meaning given in s. 632.85 (1) (c).AB1087,4,218(2) Special enrollment period. A health benefit plan or self-insured health 19plan shall allow a pregnant individual who is eligible for coverage under the plan, 20and any individual who is eligible for coverage under the plan because of a 21relationship to the pregnant individual, to enroll for coverage at any time during the 22pregnancy. The coverage shall begin no later than the first day of the first calendar 23month in which the pregnant individual receives medical verification of the 1pregnancy, except that a pregnant individual may direct coverage to begin on the 2first day of any month occurring during the pregnancy.AB1087,4,63(3) Notice. An insurer offering group health insurance coverage in this state 4shall provide notice of the special enrollment period under sub. (2) at or before the 5time an individual is initially offered the opportunity to enroll for coverage under 6the plan.AB1087,87Section 8. Initial applicability.AB1087,4,118(1) (a) For policies and plans containing provisions inconsistent with this act, 9the act first applies to policy or plan years beginning on January 1 of the year 10following the year in which this paragraph takes effect, except as provided in par. 11(b).AB1087,4,1612(b) For policies and plans that are affected by a collective bargaining 13agreement containing provisions inconsistent with this act, this act first applies to 14policy or plan years beginning on the effective date of this paragraph or on the day 15on which the collective bargaining agreement is newly established, extended, 16modified, or renewed, whichever is later.AB1087,917Section 9. Effective date.AB1087,4,1918(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 4th month beginning after 19publication.AB1087,4,2020